Mississippi, session 2026, HB1256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Any taxpayer who is an active drilling member of the Army National Guard or Air National Guard and eligible for an exemption from gross income under Section 27-7-15(4)(m) shall be allowed a refundable credit against the taxes imposed under this chapter in the manner prescribed in this section.  The amount of the credit shall be equal to Six Hundred Fifty Dollars ($650.00).  If the amount of credit claimed by a taxpayer exceeds the amount of income tax imposed upon the taxpayer for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all other credits allowable to the taxpayer under the state income tax laws, except credit for tax payments made by or on behalf of the taxpayer, then the taxpayer shall receive a refund from the Department of Revenue for the amount of such excess. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified as a new section in Chapter 7, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  Nothing in this act shall affect or defeat any claim, assessment, appeal, suit, right or cause of action for taxes due or accrued under the income tax laws before the date on which this act becomes effective, whether such claims, assessments, appeals, suits or actions have been begun before the date on which this act becomes effective or are begun thereafter; and the provisions of the income tax laws are expressly continued in full force, effect and operation for the purpose of the assessment, collection and enrollment of liens for any taxes due or accrued and the execution of any warrant under such laws before the date on which this act becomes effective, and for the imposition of any penalties, forfeitures or claims for failure to comply with such laws. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2026.